Utah statutes.
17-43-203.   Definition of "public funds" -- Responsibility for oversight of
public funds -- Substance abuse programs and services.
(1)  As used in this section, "public funds":
(a)  means:
(i)  federal money received from the department or the Department of Health;
and
(ii)  state money appropriated by the Legislature to the department, the
Department of Health, a county governing body, or a local substance abuse
authority for the purposes of providing substance abuse programs or services;
and
(b)  includes that federal and state money:
(i)  even after the money has been transferred by a local substance abuse
authority to a private provider under an annual or otherwise ongoing contract
to provide comprehensive substance abuse programs or services for the local
substance abuse authority; and
(ii)  while in the possession of the private provider.
(2)  Each local substance abuse authority is responsible for oversight of all
public funds received by it, to determine that those public funds are utilized
in accordance with federal and state law, the rules and policies of the
department and the Department of Health, and the provisions of any contract
between the local substance abuse authority and the department, the Department
of Health, or a private provider.  That oversight includes requiring that
neither the contract provider, as described in Subsection (1), nor any of its
employees:
(a)  violate any applicable federal or state criminal law;
(b)  knowingly violate any applicable rule or policy of the department or
Department of Health, or any provision of contract between the local substance
abuse authority and the department, the Department of Health, or the private
provider;
(c)  knowingly keep any false account or make any false entry or erasure in
any account of or relating to the public funds;
(d)  fraudulently alter, falsify, conceal, destroy, or obliterate any account
of or relating to public funds;
(e)  fail to ensure competent oversight for lawful disbursement of public
funds;
(f)  appropriate public funds for an unlawful use or for a use that is not in
compliance with contract provisions; or
(g)  knowingly or intentionally use public funds unlawfully or in violation of
a governmental contract provision, or in violation of state policy.
(3)  Each local substance abuse authority that knows or reasonably should know
of any of the circumstances described in Subsection (2), and that fails or
refuses to take timely corrective action in good faith shall, in addition to
any other penalties provided by law, be required to make full and complete
repayment to the state of all public funds improperly used or expended.
(4)  Any public funds required to be repaid to the state by a local substance
abuse authority under Subsection (3), based upon the actions or failure of the
contract provider, may be recovered by the local substance abuse authority
from its contract provider, in addition to the local substance abuse
authority's costs and attorney's fees.
